sk-SK: Režim zobrazenia: Analógový; Digitálny; Iné
pt-BR: Modo de exibição: Analógico; Digital; Outro
it: Modalità del display: Analog; Digital; Altro
vi: Chế độ hiển thị: Analog; Kỹ thuật số; Khác
fr: Mode d’affichage: Analogique; Numérique; Autre
bg-BG: Режим на показване: Аналогов; Цифров; Други
ja: ディスプレイモード: アナログ; デジタル; その他
da: Visningstilstand: Analog; Digital; Andet
nl: Weergavemodus: Analoog; Digitaal; Andere
lt-LT: Ekrano režimas: Analoginis; Skaitmeninė; Kita
nb: Displaymodus: Analog; Digital; Annet
sl-SI: Način prikaza: Analogni; Digitalno; Drugo
de: Anzeigemodus: Analog; Digital; Sonstiges
fi: Näyttötila: Analoginen; Digitaalinen; Muu
pl: Tryb wyświetlania: Analogowy; Cyfrowe; Inne
tr: Ekran modu: Analog; Dijital; Diğer
th: โหมดจอแสดงผล: อนาล็อก; ดิจิทัล; อื่นๆ
ko: 디스플레이 모드: 아날로그; 디지털; 기타
hr-HR: Način rada zaslona: Analogni; Digitalni; Ostalo
cs: Zobrazovací režim: Analogový; Digitální; Jiné
ru: Режим отображения данных: Аналоговые; Цифровой; Другой
sv: Displayläge: Analog; Digital; Övrigt
el: Λειτουργία εμφάνισης: Αναλογικό; Ψηφιακός; Άλλο
hu: Kijelzőmód: Analóg; Digitális; Egyéb
zh-TW: 顯示器模式: 類比; 數位; 其他
en: Display mode: Analog; Digital; Other
es: Modo de visualización: Analógico; Digital; Otros
ro-RO: Mod afișaj: Analogic; Digital; Altele
pt-PT: Modo de visualização: Analógico; Digital; Outro
zh-CN: 显示模式: 模拟; 数字化; 其他